Hawaii statutes.
[§23-80] Review for 2026 and every
tenth year thereafter. (a) The exemptions or exclusions under the general
excise and use taxes listed in subsection (c) shall be reviewed in 2026 and
every tenth year thereafter.

(b) The auditor shall submit the findings and
recommendations of the reviews to the legislature and governor no later than
twenty days prior to the convening of the immediately following regular
session.

(c) This section shall apply to the following:

(1) Section 237-29.5--Value or gross proceeds from
tangible personal property shipped out of State;

(2) Section 237-29.53--Value or gross income from
contracting or services performed for use outside the State;

(3) Section 238-1, paragraph (9) of the definition of
"use"--The value of services or contracting imported for resale,
consumption, or use outside the State; and

(4) Section 237-29.55--Gross proceeds or gross income
from the sale of tangible personal property imported into the State for
subsequent resale. [L 2016, c 261, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next